Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2801
Railroad right-of-way; acquisition by state agency; approval of Legislature; exception.

No agency of this state shall purchase, lease, or acquire real estate from any railroad over a right-of-way outside of incorporated cities and villages which has been permitted to be abandoned by a federal agency without prior approval by the Legislature of such purchase, lease, or acquisition, except that (1) the Game and Parks Commission may acquire all or any part of a railroad right-of-way proposed to be abandoned for interim trail use pursuant to sections 37-303 and 37-914 and (2) the Department of Transportation may acquire such real estate solely for the purpose of highway construction or improvements when such right-of-way is adjacent to an existing state highway or when such right-of-way is needed to maintain existing improvements that have previously been located upon such right-of-way through agreements, easements, or leases. Real estate acquired by the department pursuant to this section which is in excess of that needed or is deemed no longer necessary shall be disposed of as provided for in section 39-1325.

Laws 1971, LB 662, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 119, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 74-424;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 21;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 410;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 290.